Utah statutes.
41-1a-108.   Division inspection of applications for registration, certificate of title, or license plate.

(1)  The division shall examine and determine the genuineness, regularity, and legality of each application for:

(a)  registration of a vehicle;

(b)  a certificate of title for a vehicle, vessel, or outboard motor;

(c)  license plates; and

(d)  any other request lawfully made to the division.

(2)  The division may investigate or require additional information on any application or request necessary to implement this chapter.

(3)  When the division is satisfied as to the genuineness, regularity, and legality of an application and that the applicant is entitled to register the vehicle and to the issuance of a certificate of title, the division shall register the vehicle, issue a certificate of title and issue license plates.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 1, 1992 General Session

